Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1101
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to provide for dependable electric service at the lowest practical cost to all of the citizens of the state, including the residents of cities and villages.

The maintenance of competing electric systems within such cities or villages results in duplication of facilities and personnel and the needless expenditure of public funds by both such competing systems; that such needless expenditure for duplicating service by publicly owned agencies is not in accord with sound public policy. Whenever such duplicating competition exists in any municipality between a public power district organized under the provisions of Chapter 70, article 6, and other public agencies, including municipalities, such competition should be eliminated in the public interest for economy of operation and lower rates to the consumer.

Laws 1963, c. 398, § 2, p. 1270.

This section is applicable in instances where two or more electric systems are competing against each other for consumer business within a given municipality. The intended purpose of this section is limited to legalizing service area boundary agreements between public power districts and municipally owned electric systems and to establishing a power review board. Southern Neb. Rural P.P. Dist. v. Nebraska Electric, 249 Neb. 913, 546 N.W.2d 315 (1996).